Maryland, session 2026, HB0279.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
9–619.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “COMMITTEE” MEANS A MEDICATION REVIEW COMMITTEE
ESTABLISHED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION THAT CONVENES TO DETERMINE
WHETHER TO APPROVE THE ADMINISTRATION OF PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION ON
A NONEMERGENCY BASIS TO AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL WHO REFUSES TO
ACCEPT PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION AS PRESCRIBED.
(3) “LAY ADVISOR” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS KNOWLEDGEABLE
ABOUT MENTAL HEALTH PRACTICE AND CAN ASSIST INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS
WITH UNDERSTANDING THE PROCESS OUTLINED IN THIS SECTION, THE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S RIGHTS UNDER THIS SECTION, AND HOW TO ASSERT
THOSE RIGHTS.
(4) “LICENSED MENTAL HEALTH INFIRMARY” MEANS A DESIGNATED
UNIT WITHIN A STATE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY THAT IS LICENSED BY THE
MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AS A MENTAL HEALTH INFIRMARY.
(4) “MENTAL HEALTH CARE FACILITY” MEANS A MENTAL HEALTH
UNIT WITHIN THE DIVISION OF CORRECTION THAT IS LICENSED BY THE OFFICE OF
HEALTH CARE QUALITY AS A HEALTH CARE FACILITY WITHIN A CORRECTIONAL
INSTITUTION UNDER COMAR 10.07.12 TO PROVIDE MENTAL HEALTH CARE TO
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS AND IN WHICH:
(I) A PSYCHIATRIST SUPERVISES TREATMENT;
(II) A PSYCHIATRIST OR PSYCHIATRIC NURSE PRACTITIONER IS
AVAILABLE FOR CONSULTATION WHENEVER A PSYCHIATRIST OR PSYCHIATRIC
NURSE PRACTITIONER IS NOT PRESENT; AND
(III) THERE IS 24–HOUR NURSE STAFFING.
(5) “TREATING PROVIDER” MEANS A LICENSED PSYCHIATRIST OR
PSYCHIATRIC NURSE PRACTITIONER.

HOUSE BILL 279 3
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO LICENSED MENTAL HEALTH
INFIRMARIES WITHIN STATE CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO MENTAL HEALTH CARE FACILITIES
WITHIN STATE CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES FOR INDIVIDUALS CONVICTED OF A
CRIME AND SENTENCED TO THE DIVISION OF CORRECTION.
(C) PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION MAY NOT BE ADMINISTERED TO AN
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL WHO REFUSES THE MEDICATION, EXCEPT:
(1) IN AN EMERGENCY, ON THE ORDER OF A PRACTITIONER TREATING
PROVIDER WHEN THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL PRESENTS AN IMMINENT
DANGER TO THE LIFE OR SAFETY OF SELF OR OTHERS; OR
(2) IN A NONEMERGENCY, IF THE TREATING PRACTITIONER
PROVIDER HAS RECOMMENDED THE INVOLUNTARY ADMINISTRATION OF
PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION BECAUSE:
(I) THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL HAS A MENTAL DISORDER;
(II) DUE TO THE MENTAL DISORDER, THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL IS UNABLE TO FUNCTION INCAPACITATED TO THE POINT THAT THE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL IS UNABLE TO PERFORM BASIC LIFE–SUSTAINING
FUNCTION IN GENERAL POPULATION WITHIN A CORRECTIONAL FACILITY AND
REQUIRES INPATIENT CARE IN A LICENSED MENTAL HEALTH INFIRMARY WITHIN
THE DEPARTMENT CARE FACILITY;
(III) DUE TO THE MENTAL DISORDER, THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL PRESENTS A MANIFESTS SEVERE MENTAL OR PHYSICAL HEALTH
DETERIORATION AND PRESENTS A SERIOUS DANGER TO THE LIFE AND SAFETY OF
SELF OR OTHERS;
(IV) THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL IS UNABLE OR UNWILLING
DUE TO A MENTAL DISORDER TO GIVE INFORMED CONSENT TO THE
ADMINISTRATION OF PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION;
(V) THERE ARE NO LESS RESTRICTIVE TREATMENT
INTERVENTIONS, INCLUDING ENCOURAGING VOLUNTARY MEDICATION
COMPLIANCE, CONSISTENT WITH THE WELFARE AND SAFETY OF THE INDIVIDUAL;
(VI) THE USE OF PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION IS CLINICALLY
INDICATED AS THE MOST APPROPRIATE TREATMENT FOR THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL’S CONDITION ACCORDING TO CURRENT PRACTICE FOR RESTORING OR

HOUSE BILL 279
PREVENTING FURTHER DETERIORATION OF THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S
MENTAL OR PHYSICAL HEALTH; AND
(VII) A COMMITTEE HAS DETERMINED, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION, THAT PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION SHOULD BE
ADMINISTERED OVER THE OBJECTION OF THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL.
(D) (1) A COMMITTEE SHALL CONSIST OF THE FOLLOWING INDIVIDUALS
APPOINTED BY THE DIRECTOR OF MENTAL HEALTH FOR THE DEPARTMENT OR THE
DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE:
(I) THE CHIEF PSYCHIATRIST FOR THE REGION WHERE THE
LICENSED MENTAL HEALTH INFIRMARY MENTAL HEALTH CARE FACILITY IS
LOCATED;
(II) ANOTHER PSYCHIATRIST; AND
(III) A MENTAL HEALTH PROFESSIONAL WHO IS NOT A
PHYSICIAN.
(2) THE DIRECTOR OF MENTAL HEALTH OR THE DIRECTOR’S
DESIGNEE SHALL APPOINT A CHAIR OF THE COMMITTEE FROM AMONG ITS
MEMBERS.
(3) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS DIRECTLY RESPONSIBLE FOR
IMPLEMENTING THE TREATMENT PLAN FOR THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL
UNDER REVIEW MAY NOT SERVE AS A MEMBER OF THE COMMITTEE.
(E) THE DIRECTOR OF MENTAL HEALTH OR THE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE
SHALL ASSIGN AN IMPARTIAL LAY ADVISOR TO ASSIST THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL WITH THE PROCESS SET FORTH IN THIS SECTION.
(F) (1) THE DIRECTOR OF MENTAL HEALTH OR THE DIRECTOR’S
DESIGNEE SHALL GIVE THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL AND THE LAY ADVISOR
WRITTEN NOTICE AT LEAST 10 BUSINESS DAYS BEFORE CONVENING THE
COMMITTEE THAT TO:
(I) THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL;
(II) THE LAY ADVISOR;
(III) IF APPLICABLE, THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S
GUARDIAN OF THE PERSON;

HOUSE BILL 279 5
(IV) IF APPLICABLE AND IF THERE IS NO GUARDIAN OF THE
PERSON, THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S SURROGATE DECISION MAKER; AND
(V) IF APPLICABLE, THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S
ATTORNEY.
(2) THE NOTICE PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(1) (I) THE DATE, TIME, AND LOCATION OF THE SCHEDULED
COMMITTEE MEETING;
(2) (II) THE PURPOSE OF THE COMMITTEE; AND
(3) (III) A COMPLETE DESCRIPTION OF THE RIGHTS OF AN
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL UNDER SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION.
(G) IN CONNECTION WITH THE CONVENING OF A COMMITTEE, AN
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL HAS:
(1) HAS THE RIGHT TO:
(1) (I) ATTEND THE COMMITTEE MEETING, EXCEPT FOR THE
DISCUSSION CONDUCTED TO ARRIVE AT A DECISION;
(2) (II) PRESENT INFORMATION, INCLUDING WITNESSES;
(3) (III) ASK QUESTIONS OF ANY PERSON PRESENTING
INFORMATION TO THE COMMITTEE;
(4) (IV) REQUEST ASSISTANCE FROM A LAY ADVISOR; AND
(5) (V) BE INFORMED OF:
(I) 1. THE IDENTITY OF THE ASSIGNED LAY ADVISOR;
(II) 2. THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S DIAGNOSIS; AND
(III) 3. THE CLINICAL NEED FOR THE PSYCHOTROPIC
MEDICATION, INCLUDING POTENTIAL SIDE EFFECTS AND MATERIAL RISKS AND
BENEFITS OF TAKING OR REFUSING THE MEDICATION; AND
(2) MAY HAVE A LAWYER OR OTHER ADVOCATE OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S
CHOICE PRESENT.

HOUSE BILL 279
(H) THE CHAIR OF A COMMITTEE MAY:
(1) POSTPONE OR CONTINUE THE COMMITTEE FOR GOOD CAUSE, FOR
UP TO 7 DAYS; AND
(2) TAKE APPROPRIATE MEASURES NECESSARY TO CONDUCT THE
COMMITTEE IN AN ORDERLY MANNER.
(I) (1) BEFORE A COMMITTEE MEETS, THE TREATING PSYCHIATRIC
PROVIDER SHALL PROVIDE A DETAILED REPORT OF THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL’S MEDICAL RECORD TO INCLUDE:
(I) THE BASIS FOR THE REQUEST TO ADMINISTER
PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION ON A NONEMERGENCY BASIS;
(II) THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S DIAGNOSIS, BEHAVIORS
OBSERVED, AND CURRENT MENTAL STATUS;
(III) A DESCRIPTION OF DAILY FUNCTIONING;
(IV) RECOMMENDED PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION AND ANY
ALTERNATIVE MEDICATIONS THAT COULD BE EFFECTIVE FOR THE INDIVIDUAL;
(V) A PROPOSED TREATMENT PLAN THAT DETAILS THE
SUPPORTIVE SERVICES AND THERAPIES THAT WILL BE OFFERED TO THE
INDIVIDUAL IN CONJUNCTION WITH THE PROPOSED MEDICATION;
(V) (VI) METHODS USED TO ENCOURAGE VOLUNTARY
MEDICATION ADHERENCE;
(VI) (VII) VOLUNTARY AND INVOLUNTARY MEDICATION
HISTORY; AND
(VII) (VIII) A DESCRIPTION OF THE LESS INTRUSIVE TREATMENT
ALTERNATIVES CONSIDERED OR ATTEMPTED; AND
(IX) ANY INFORMATION OBTAINED THROUGH A SIGNED RELEASE
OF INFORMATION FROM PRIOR COMMUNITY PROVIDERS AND THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL’S FAMILY MEMBERS OR GUARDIAN.
(2) THE REPORT SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED TO THE COMMITTEE
MEMBERS, THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL, THE LAY ADVISOR, AND THE

HOUSE BILL 279 7
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S ATTORNEY, IF ANY, NOT LESS THAN 72 HOURS
BEFORE THE COMMITTEE IS TO MEET.
(J) BEFORE DETERMINING WHETHER TO APPROVE THE ADMINISTRATION
OF PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION, THE COMMITTEE SHALL:
(1) REVIEW THE REPORT GENERATED BY THE TREATING
PSYCHIATRIC PROVIDER UNDER SUBSECTION (I) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) MEET FOR THE PURPOSE OF RECEIVING INFORMATION AND
CLINICALLY ASSESSING THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S NEED FOR MEDICATION
BY:
(I) CONSULTING WITH THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL
REGARDING THE REASON FOR REFUSING THE PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION
PRESCRIBED AND THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S WILLINGNESS TO ACCEPT
ALTERNATIVE TREATMENT, INCLUDING OTHER MEDICATION;
(II) CONSULTING WITH THE TREATING CLINICIANS PROVIDERS
AND MEDICAL STAFF WHO ARE RESPONSIBLE FOR INITIATING AND IMPLEMENTING
THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S TREATMENT PLAN ABOUT THE CURRENT
TREATMENT PLAN AND ALTERNATIVE MODES OF TREATMENT, INCLUDING
MEDICATION, THAT HAVE BEEN CONSIDERED;
(III) RECEIVING INFORMATION PRESENTED BY THE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL AND OTHER INDIVIDUALS PARTICIPATING IN THE
COMMITTEE;
(IV) PROVIDING THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL WITH AN
OPPORTUNITY TO ASK QUESTIONS OF ANYONE PRESENTING INFORMATION TO THE
COMMITTEE; AND
(V) REVIEWING THE CONSEQUENCES OF REQUIRING THE
ADMINISTRATION OF PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION AND THE CONSEQUENCES OF
CONTINUED REFUSAL OF PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION.
(K) THE COMMITTEE MAY APPROVE THE ADMINISTRATION OF
PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION AND MAY RECOMMEND AND APPROVE ALTERNATIVE
MEDICATION, IF THE COMMITTEE DETERMINES THAT:
(1) THE MEDICATION IS PRESCRIBED BY A PSYCHIATRIC PROVIDER
FOR THE PURPOSE OF TREATING THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S MENTAL
DISORDER;

HOUSE BILL 279
(2) THE ADMINISTRATION OF PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION
REPRESENTS A REASONABLE EXERCISE OF PROFESSIONAL JUDGMENT; AND
(3) WITHOUT THE MEDICATION, THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL IS
AT SUBSTANTIAL RISK OF CONTINUED SELF–HARM AND DANGEROUS BEHAVIORS
RESULTING FROM THE INDIVIDUAL:
(I) REMAINING SERIOUSLY MENTALLY ILL WITH NO
SIGNIFICANT RELIEF OF THE PSYCHIATRIC SYMPTOMS THAT:
1. CAUSE THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL TO BE A
DANGER TO SELF OR OTHERS WHILE IN THE LICENSED MENTAL HEALTH INFIRMARY
MENTAL HEALTH CARE FACILITY; OR
2. WOULD CAUSE THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL TO
BE A CONTINUED DANGER TO SELF AND OTHER INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS IF
DISCHARGED FROM THE LICENSED MENTAL HEALTH INFIRMARY MENTAL HEALTH
CARE FACILITY; OR
(II) RELAPSING INTO A CONDITION IN WHICH THE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL IS UNABLE TO PROVIDE FOR THE INDIVIDUAL’S OWN
ESSENTIAL HUMAN NEEDS OF HEALTH AND SAFETY.
(L) (1) THE COMMITTEE SHALL BASE ITS DECISION ON ITS CLINICAL
ASSESSMENT OF THE INFORMATION CONTAINED IN THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL’S RECORD AND INFORMATION PRESENTED TO THE COMMITTEE.
(2) THE COMMITTEE SHALL MEET PRIVATELY TO RENDER A
DECISION.
(M) (1) THE COMMITTEE SHALL DOCUMENT ITS CONSIDERATION OF THE
ISSUES AND THE BASIS FOR ITS DECISION ON THE ADMINISTRATION OF
PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION.
(2) THE COMMITTEE SHALL PROVIDE A WRITTEN DECISION ON THE
ADMINISTRATION OF PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION AND PROPOSED TREATMENT
PLAN, WHICH SHALL BE PROVIDED TO THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL, THE LAY
ADVISOR, THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S GUARDIAN OF THE PERSON, IF ANY,
AND THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S TREATMENT TEAM FOR INCLUSION IN THE
MEDICAL RECORD.

HOUSE BILL 279 9
(3) IF THE COMMITTEE APPROVES THE ADMINISTRATION OF
PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION, THE DECISION SHALL SPECIFY:
(I) THE PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION APPROVED AND THE
DOSAGE AND FREQUENCY RANGE;
(II) THE DURATION OF THE APPROVAL, NOT TO EXCEED THE
MAXIMUM TIME ALLOWED UNDER SUBSECTION (Q) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(III) THE REASON THAT ALTERNATIVE TREATMENTS, INCLUDING
OTHER MEDICATION, WERE REJECTED BY THE COMMITTEE.
(4) IF THE COMMITTEE APPROVES THE ADMINISTRATION OF
PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION, THE DECISION SHALL CONTAIN:
(I) NOTICE OF THE RIGHT TO REQUEST AN ADMINISTRATIVE
HEARING AND APPEAL A HEARING UNDER SUBSECTIONS (O) AND (P) SUBSECTION
(O) OF THIS SECTION;
(II) THE RIGHT TO REQUEST REPRESENTATION OR ASSISTANCE
OF AN ATTORNEY OR OTHER ADVOCATE OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S CHOICE; AND
(III) THE NAME, ADDRESS, AND TELEPHONE NUMBER OF THE
DESIGNATED STATE PROTECTION AND ADVOCACY AGENCY AND THE ATTORNEY
REFERRAL SERVICE.
(N) IF THE COMMITTEE APPROVES THE ADMINISTRATION OF
PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION, THE LAY ADVISOR PROMPTLY SHALL:
(1) INFORM THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL OF THE RIGHT TO
REQUEST AN ADMINISTRATIVE HEARING AND APPEAL THE DECISION UNDER
SUBSECTIONS (O) AND (P) OF THIS SECTION; AND AND PROVIDE THE APPEAL FORM;
(2) IF THE INDIVIDUAL REQUESTS A HEARING, NOTIFY THE DIRECTOR
OF MENTAL HEALTH FOR THE DEPARTMENT OR THE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE UNDER
SUBSECTION (O)(1) OF THIS SECTION AND GIVE THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL
WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE DATE, TIME, AND LOCATION OF THE HEARING; AND
(2) (3) ADVISE THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL OF THE
PROVISION FOR RENEWAL OF AN APPROVAL UNDER SUBSECTION (Q) OF THIS
SECTION.
(O) (1) AN INDIVIDUAL MAY REQUEST AN ADMINISTRATIVE HEARING TO
APPEAL THE COMMITTEE’S DECISION BY FILING A REQUEST FOR HEARING WITH THE

HOUSE BILL 279
DIRECTOR OF MENTAL HEALTH FOR THE DEPARTMENT OR THE DIRECTOR’S
DESIGNEE WITHIN 72 HOURS OF RECEIPT OF THE DECISION OF THE COMMITTEE.
(2) AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL MAY HAVE AN ATTORNEY OR
OTHER ADVOCATE OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S CHOICE PRESENT AT THIS HEARING.
(2) (3) WITHIN 24 HOURS OF RECEIPT OF A REQUEST FOR
HEARING, THE DIRECTOR OF MENTAL HEALTH OR THE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE
SHALL FORWARD THE REQUEST TO THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS.
(3) (4) (I) AN INITIAL COMMITTEE DECISION AUTHORIZING THE
ADMINISTRATION OF MEDICATION SHALL BE STAYED FOR 72 HOURS.
(II) IF A REQUEST FOR HEARING IS FILED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION, THE STAY SHALL REMAIN IN EFFECT UNTIL THE ISSUANCE OF THE
ADMINISTRATIVE DECISION.
(4) (5) THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS SHALL
CONDUCT A HEARING AND ISSUE A DECISION WITHIN 10 CALENDAR DAYS OF THE
DECISION BY THE COMMITTEE.
(5) (6) THE ADMINISTRATIVE HEARING MAY BE POSTPONED BY
AGREEMENT OF THE PARTIES OR FOR GOOD CAUSE SHOWN.
(6) (7) THE ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGE SHALL CONDUCT A DE
NOVO HEARING TO DETERMINE WHETHER THE STANDARDS AND PROCEDURES IN
THIS SECTION HAVE BEEN MET.
(7) (8) AT THE HEARING, THE INDIVIDUAL REPRESENTING THE
MENTAL HEALTH CARE FACILITY:
(I) MAY INTRODUCE THE DECISION OF THE COMMITTEE AS
EVIDENCE; AND
(II) SHALL PROVE, BY A PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE,
THAT THE STANDARDS AND PROCEDURES OF THIS SECTION HAVE BEEN MET.
(8) (9) THE ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGE SHALL STATE ON THE
RECORD THE FINDINGS OF FACT AND CONCLUSIONS OF LAW.
(9) (10) THE DETERMINATION OF THE ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGE
IS A FINAL DECISION FOR THE PURPOSE OF JUDICIAL REVIEW OF A FINAL DECISION
UNDER THE ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE ACT.

HOUSE BILL 279 11
(P) (1) WITHIN 14 CALENDAR DAYS FROM THE DECISION OF THE
ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGE, THE INDIVIDUAL OR THE MENTAL HEALTH CARE
FACILITY MAY APPEAL THE DECISION TO THE CIRCUIT COURT ON THE RECORD
FROM THE HEARING CONDUCTED BY THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS.
(2) THE SCOPE OF REVIEW SHALL BE AS A CONTESTED CASE UNDER
THE ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE ACT.
(3) (I) REVIEW SHALL BE ON THE AUDIOPHONIC TAPE WITHOUT
THE NECESSITY OF TRANSCRIPTION OF THE TAPE, UNLESS EITHER PARTY TO THE
APPEAL REQUESTS TRANSCRIPTION OF THE TAPE.
(II) A REQUEST FOR TRANSCRIPTION OF THE TAPE SHALL BE
MADE AT THE TIME THE APPEAL IS FILED.
(III) THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS SHALL
PREPARE THE TRANSCRIPTION PRIOR TO THE APPEAL HEARING, AND THE PARTY
REQUESTING THE TRANSCRIPTION SHALL BEAR THE COST OF TRANSCRIPTION.
(4) THE CIRCUIT COURT SHALL HEAR AND ISSUE A DECISION ON AN A
DE NOVO APPEAL WITHIN 7 CALENDAR DAYS FROM THE DATE THE APPEAL WAS
FILED.
(Q) (1) ADMINISTRATION OF PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE APPROVED FOR LONGER THAN 90
DAYS.
(2) (I) BEFORE EXPIRATION OF AN APPROVAL PERIOD UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL
CONTINUES TO REFUSE PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION, A COMMITTEE MAY BE
CONVENED TO DECIDE WHETHER RENEWAL IS WARRANTED.
(II) IF NOTWITHSTANDING THE PROVISIONS OF PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF A COMMITTEE APPROVES THE RENEWAL OF THE
ADMINISTRATION OF PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION, THE ADMINISTRATION OF
MEDICATION NEED NOT BE INTERRUPTED WHEN THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL
REQUESTS ADMINISTRATIVE REVIEW OF THE RENEWAL.
(R) (1) WHEN PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION IS ORDERED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THIS SECTION, NOT LESS FREQUENTLY THAN EVERY 15 DAYS, THE TREATING
PRACTITIONER SHALL THE TREATING PROVIDER SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 279
(I) DOCUMENT ANY KNOWN BENEFITS OF TAKING THE
MEDICATION TO THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL AND SIDE EFFECTS OF THE
MEDICATION THAT AFFECT THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL NOT LESS
FREQUENTLY THAN:
1. EVERY DAY FOR THE FIRST WEEK AFTER INITIATION
OF MEDICATION OR AN INCREASE IN MEDICATION DOSE; AND
2. ONCE EVERY 10 DAYS THEREAFTER;
(II) OFFER THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL THE OPPORTUNITY
TO TAKE THE MEDICATION VOLUNTARILY BEFORE IT IS ADMINISTERED OVER THE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S OBJECTION; AND
(III) DOCUMENT ALL ASSESSMENTS OF THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL’S MEDICATION EFFICACY, SIDE EFFECTS, AND UPDATED TREATMENT
PLAN IN THE MEDICAL RECORD.
(2) AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL SHALL REMAIN IN THE MENTAL
HEALTH CARE FACILITY THROUGHOUT THE PROCESS DESCRIBED IN THIS SECTION.
(S) EACH INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL IN A MENTAL HEALTH CARE
FACILITY SHALL:
(1) RECEIVE APPROPRIATE HUMANE TREATMENT AND SERVICES IN A
MANNER THAT RESTRICTS THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S PERSONAL LIBERTY
WITHIN A MENTAL HEALTH CARE FACILITY ONLY TO THE EXTENT NECESSARY AND
CONSISTENT WITH THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S TREATMENT NEEDS AND
APPLICABLE LEGAL REQUIREMENTS;
(2) BE FREE FROM RESTRAINTS OR SECLUSIONS EXCEPT FOR
RESTRAINTS OR SECLUSIONS THAT ARE:
(I) USED ONLY DURING AN EMERGENCY IN WHICH THE
BEHAVIOR OF THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL PLACES THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL OR OTHERS AT SERIOUS THREAT OF VIOLENCE OR INJURY; AND
(II) 1. ORDERED BY A PHYSICIAN IN WRITING; OR
2. DIRECTED BY A REGISTERED NURSE IF A PHYSICIAN’S
ORDER IS OBTAINED WITHIN 2 HOURS OF THE ACTION;
(3) BE FREE FROM PRONE RESTRAINT; AND

HOUSE BILL 279 13
(4) BE FREE FROM RESTRAINT THAT:
(I) APPLIES PRESSURE TO THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S
BACK;
(II) OBSTRUCTS THE AIRWAY OF THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL OR IMPAIRS THE INDIVIDUAL’S ABILITY TO BREATHE;
(III) OBSTRUCTS A STAFF MEMBER’S VIEW OF THE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S FACE; OR
(IV) RESTRICTS THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S ABILITY TO
COMMUNICATE DISTRESS.
(T) STATEMENTS MADE BY AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL IN CONNECTION
WITH THE CONVENING OF A COMMITTEE UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE USED:
(1) AS EVIDENCE TO CHARGE THE INDIVIDUAL WITH A CRIME; OR
(2) AS THE BASIS FOR A LOSS OF DIMINUTION CREDITS.
(U) IF AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL IS DEEMED COMPETENT AFTER THE
ADMINISTRATION OF PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION UNDER THIS SECTION, THE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S LAY ADVISOR SHALL ADVISE THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S RIGHT TO COMPLETE AN ADVANCE DIRECTIVE
FOR MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES UNDER § 5–602.1 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL
ARTICLE.
(V) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH ON THE
ADMINISTRATION OF PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION IN A NONEMERGENCY UNDER
THIS SECTION, INCLUDING:
(1) THE NUMBER OF TIMES A COMMITTEE WAS CONVENED UNDER
SUBSECTION (J) OF THIS SECTION;
(2) THE NUMBER OF TIMES A COMMITTEE APPROVED THE
ADMINISTRATION OF PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION UNDER THIS SECTION;
(3) THE NUMBER OF TIMES A COMMITTEE WAS CONVENED TO DECIDE
ON A RENEWAL UNDER SUBSECTION (Q) OF THIS SECTION;
(4) THE NUMBER OF TIMES A COMMITTEE APPROVED A RENEWAL
UNDER SUBSECTION (Q) OF THIS SECTION; AND

HOUSE BILL 279
(5) FOR EACH INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL FOR WHOM A COMMITTEE
APPROVES THE ADMINISTRATION OF PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION, THE
MEDICATION GIVEN AND THE LENGTH OF TIME THE MEDICATION WAS FORCIBLY
GIVEN.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.